Hawaii statutes.
§352D-5 Appointment of director; powers and
duties. (a) The office of youth services shall be headed by an executive
director who shall be appointed by the governor without regard to chapter 76.
The executive director may appoint such other staff as may be necessary to
carry out the duties of the office of youth services.

(b) The executive director, for the
administration of the Juvenile Justice Delinquency Prevention Act, may employ
any other staff without regard to chapter 76. [L 1989, c 375, pt of §1; am L
1993, c 318, §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next